Toggle Mobile Nav
Toggle search
Home
Who We Are
What We Do
Investors
Careers
News
Search results in:
All
News
Events
Product Security Incident Responses
Search news, press releases, investor news...
|
Teledyne Technologies
|
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy

Privacy Policy (English)
Politique de confidentialité (French)
Datenschutzbestimmungen (German)

At Teledyne we know that you care about how the Personal Information we
      receive about you is used and shared, and we take the protection of your
      Personal Information seriously.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Teledyne Technologies Incorporated
,
      1049 Camino Dos Rios, Thousand Oaks, CA 91360, USA who, along with other
      affiliates in the Teledyne Group of companies are data controllers
      (“Teledyne”, “we”, “us”, “our”), treats Personal Information (as defined
      below) that Teledyne collects and receives through your use of Teledyne
      websites (collectively the “
Teledyne Site
”) or through your
      requests relating to and orders for Teledyne products and services
      (including cloud services (“
Cloud Services
”)) provided by us online
      or offline in accordance with applicable data privacy laws (collectively
      “
Teledyne Products & Services
”). In addition to this Privacy
      Policy, specific notices may be made available to you when you register or
      log in for specific services activities, or when we require your consent.
      Such specific notices may also indicate the specific Teledyne affiliate
      which is the controller (or together with Teledyne, co-controller) of the
      Personal Information processing operations involved.
This Privacy Policy Only Applies to Teledyne
This Privacy Policy does not apply to the processing of personal data by
      companies that Teledyne does not own or control, or by the staff of such
      companies that Teledyne does not employ or manage.
Children’s Privacy Policy
The Teledyne Site is not intended for use by minors or by children,
      including children under the age of thirteen. Teledyne does not knowingly
      collect Personal Information online from minors or children. If you think
      that Teledyne has collected Personal Information from your child, please
      contact us at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
(or at the address provided below). Because Teledyne is committed to
      protecting children’s privacy online, use of the Teledyne Site by children
      under the age of thirteen is prohibited.
Collection and use of your Personal Information and purpose
“Personal Information” is information of an identified or identifiable
      natural person: an identifiable natural person is one who can be
      identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an
      identifier such as your name, address, email address or phone number.
      Personal Information, sometimes referred to as "personal data”, and
      “sensitive” Personal Information, may also have specific meanings under
      different privacy laws.
The categories of personal information that Teledyne may collect from
      website users and customers are:
Personal identifiers, such as your name, postal address, email address,
        online identifier, internet protocol address, account name, passport
        number or other similar identifiers;
Customers records such as name, signature, financial information,
        telephone number;
Interaction Information, which includes information about your
        interactions with Teledyne such as information collected when you
        participate in promotions or programs or when you contact our customer
        service, visitor logs;
Commercial information, including products or services purchased,
        obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or
        tendencies;
Biometric information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including,
        but not limited to, information collected using cookies and similar
        technologies, browsing history and search history while using our
        digital offerings, and other information regarding your interactions
        with our digital offerings or our advertisements;
Geolocation data;
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar data relating to your
        interactions with us, such as call center recordings, video images, CCTV
        recordings, and photographs;
Education information;
Professional or employment related information, such as job title and
        business contact information;
Inferences drawn from any of the information listed above to create a
        profile about you, such as a profile that reflects your preferences,
        characteristics, behavior, and attitudes;
Compliance data, which includes records maintained to demonstrate
        compliance with applicable laws; records related to consumer preferences
        (such as opt-ins and opt-outs of marketing programs and cookies) and
        records related to data subject rights requests.
Some of the Personal Information in these categories (alone or in
      combination with other information) may be considered as sensitive
      Personal Information in certain jurisdictions (designated as “special
      categories of data” in accordance with GDPR) and subject to additional
      restrictions (such as consent or explicit consent).
Teledyne collects Personal Information in a number of circumstances,
        either automatically or when you provide it to us
, including under the following circumstances and for the following
      purposes and depending on your relationship and interactions with
      Teledyne:
1.
About you as our contact person for our business partners, customers
          and end users, vendors and suppliers
, when we set up your company’s account enterprise resources planning
      system, and in the framework of our existing business relationship. This
      will necessarily involve the processing of the following data: contact
      information (full name, postal work address, work email address and
      telephone numbers), job title, payment information (bank account number,
      tax ID, and other related billing information and data necessary for
      processing payments and fraud prevention), data relating to purchase
      history.
We will use this information to:
allow Teledyne to execute the contract concluded with you:
to issue a quote, for order entry and to establish a contract;
to fulfill your purchase contract or making available a free demo,
        including making required shipping arrangements and provide related
        customer support;
to ensure timely supply of critical firmware updates (by email
        notification or otherwise);
to communicate about the Teledyne Products & Services you purchased, or
        to respond to your queries or requests (including relating to Teledyne
        Products & Services);
to send administrative information to you (such as information relating
        to the Teledyne Site and changes to our terms, conditions and policies),
pursue Teledyne’s legitimate interest to:
create and communicate content and offers most relevant to you, and to
        send relevant personalized marketing communications to you;
send offers and accessories related to your purchase, and newsletters
        relating to Teledyne’s Products & Services to you;
keep your technical skills required to operate our cameras up to date,
        by sending invitations to trainings, camera tutorials and online
        programs and reminders of certification renewal dates to you;
send reminders of the upcoming expiration date of your equipment’s
        calibration and commercial warranties.
2.
Non-Teledyne non-US Party Vetting and Screening
:
Prior to setting up your company’s account or entering into a
        transaction with your company, we will need to screen your company
        against prohibited parties’ lists, which may involve the processing of
        the following Personal Information relating to yourself, as a contact
        person of your employing entity: your name, title, address, email, and
        telephone number;
In case of an intended visit of a Teledyne facility, or receipt of
        export controlled technical information or defense services, on behalf
        of your employer, we will need to screen you against prohibited parties’
        lists, prior to allowing you any access to such Teledyne facility or
        technical information, which may involve the processing of the following
        Personal Information you have provided to us: full name, email address,
        telephone number, job title, current and past citizenship and current
        country of permanent residence, and/or information contained in ID
        cards, country of birth, and your photograph to issue a visitor badge;
Prior to onboarding your company as a new business partner, we may
        process the following Personal Information about you as owner, or key
        personnel of your company: your date of birth, ID card numbers, and
        information about relevant and significant litigation or other legal
        proceedings against business partners.
We process the data relating to your company and/or yourself, as non-US
        persons, for the purposes of:
complying with US and foreign export control and sanctions laws, which
        prevents Teledyne from engaging in any business activity with entities
        or individuals appearing on US and foreign Government issued lists of
        Denied and Restricted parties, or to transfer certain technical export
        controlled data to non-US parties without a proper license being in
        place;
carrying out an adequate due diligence of our business partners in
        compliance with applicable US and foreign anti-bribery laws.
3.
When you visit a Teledyne Site
: certain information is collected by most browsers or automatically
      through your device, such as your Media Access Control (MAC) address,
      computer type, screen resolution, operating system name and version,
      device manufacturer and model, language, internet browser type and
      version, the name and version of the Teledyne Site you are using, and the
      IP address of your PC or other device, records related to customer
      preferences (opt-ins and opt-out outs of marketing programs and cookies).
We will use this information to pursue our legitimate interest to make the
      Teledyne Site more easy for you to use, to improve and help develop the
      Teledyne Site and related IT systems, and to fulfill our business purpose,
      such as:
carrying out data analysis, identifying usage trends, analyze how
        visitors use and browse Teledyne Sites;
carrying out audits, fraud monitoring and prevention;
developing new products, enhancing improving our modifying our products,
        determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns and operating
        and expanding our business activities.
Certain online information about you or device information when you visit
      our website or use or mobile apps may originate from the use of cookies
      and similar technologies that store or accesses information on your device
      (e.g. pixel tags, unique identifiers etc.); we use this information to
      deliver functionality on and improve efficiency of our websites, to
      improve your user experience by storing and using information on your
      website preferences and habits, and to show you personalized
      advertisements on the basis of your Web browsing and profile. For more
      information on cookies, please see section “Cookies” below.
4.
Online Registration for use of Teledyne Products & Services:
When you are an existing customer (with an existing account) you are
      eligible, on certain Teledyne Sites, to obtain a Single Sign-On (SSO)
      account which will enable you to access various Teledyne Products &
      Services online via our secured platform (“Portal”). For this you must
      first complete a registration procedure which requires you to provide
      certain Personal Information, such as your name, email address, job title,
      telephone number, username and password, as well as account details, such
      as information on the Teledyne customer on whose behalf you register the
      account. When you provide this information, we keep it on file with any
      information you have already volunteered to us on previous visits to the
      Teledyne Site.
We process this information to allow you to:
create and manage your online account profile;
manage your marketing communication preferences; and
to allow you to use certain features of the Teledyne Site or to use or
        purchase various Teledyne Products & Services online (as the case by
        providing additional information):
When you buy and install a new product, we will invite you to register
        your purchase electronically. At this occasion we will ask you to
        provide your name, email, telephone number, postal address. Providing
        this information is voluntary. We process such information to allow you
        to benefit from an extended product warranty and for the purposes listed
        in section “
Collection and use of Your Personal Information and purpose
”;.
Cloud Services: when you are uploading, accessing or downloading your
        content, or accessing Teledyne provided output data, we will process the
        following Personal Information: information the images you upload are
        tagged with (e.g. your location), Personal Information you include in
        the content you upload (e.g. annotations and comments), data related to
        the use of the service (e.g. time stamps).
5.
Customer Support
: When you contact us via our Portal to obtain support, including
      warranty and out of warranty repair, we may process the following
      information: your name, postal address, email address, telephone number,
      mobile number, product purchased and location, username and password.
6.
Product purchases via Teledyne's Webshops:
certain
      Products can be purchased via our webshops within all the markets where
      Teledyne offers the opportunity for you to make an online purchase. When
      you surf on the Teledyne Site, and place a product in your shopping cart,
      we collect the Personal Information related to your purchase (products you
      purchase or place in your shopping cart) and as described above (“
Use of Teledyne Site
”).
If Teledyne is using third party-powered stores, such third parties
      process Personal Information on behalf of Teledyne.
Certain Webshop providers are acting as controller of your Personal
      Information processed in relation to your purchase. You can find
      information on how such Webshop provider processes your Personal
      Information when you purchase and pay for a Teledyne product from/to them
      in their own privacy notice. When you have purchased a Teledyne product
      via our Webshop we collect the following information from our Webshop
      provider: your name, email address, IP address, billing address, shipping
      address, phone number, products purchased. We process that Personal
      Information for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice in the
      section “
Collection and use of Your Personal Information and purpose
”.
7.
Payment via credit card
: For any other Products that can be purchased online from Teledyne, if
      you decide to pay by credit card, upon clicking “submit and pay” you will
      be directed to our Credit Card Payment Provider's platform where you will
      need to (depending on the type of Payment Provider):
either enter your card details directly, and upon card authorization our
        Provider will only pass on to Teledyne the following Personal
        Information required for order creation by Teledyne: cardholder name and
        address, last 4 digits of card, expiry date;
or provide the following data (name, email and postal address, billing
        and other payment data) to Teledyne who will then forward these data to
        our Payment Provider. Such Payment Provider will act as controller when
        authorizing your credit card payments, and as a processor when allowing
        Teledyne to use Payment Provider’s tool to perform aggregation and/or
        analysis of data (which may include the Personal Information listed
        above) submitted to it by Teledyne.
8.
Community Forums and Chats
: You may submit Personal Information to Teledyne by using the Community
      Forum feature of the Teledyne Site or when you engage in a chat with us.
      In this case, we collect the Personal Information you volunteer to us via
      the Community Forum or via the live Chat (usually name, email address,
      phone number). We keep chat transcript data from chat sessions which will
      be deleted 90 days after the chat has concluded. Chats offer the
      possibility to engage in a live chat with Teledyne’s customer
      representatives for the purposes of facilitating instant exchange of
      information and responses in the following areas: technical support,
      pre-sales enquiries, post-sale support, InfraRed Training Center (ITC)
      inquiries, help with ecommerce carts, to better your shopping experience).
      Some live Chats may involve the use of cookies (in which case the sections
      of this Privacy Policy applicable to Cookies are applicable).
9.
Promotional Games & Contests, Surveys, Trials :
Teledyne
      may, from time to time, collect other information from you when you
      voluntarily provide it (for instance, when we make special offers, hold
      promotions, conduct surveys, or allow you to sign up for an event or
      contest or a webinar, when you volunteer to test a product or app, or when
      you download content). Personal Information collected by Teledyne is often
      limited to name, e-mail address, language, country or location, phone
      number but may include other information depending on the individual
      service you are requesting. If other information is requested, additional
      information will be provided to you in specific information notices. We
      collect this information to allow you to participate in sweepstakes,
      contests and similar promotions and to administer these activities (to
      contact you, divulge your name as the winner and ship the prize to you if
      you win). These activities have additional rules, which could contain
      additional information about how we use and disclose your Personal
      Information. This information will be provided to you along with the
      sweepstakes, contests and similar promotions.
10.
Visitor Registration and CCTV
: When you visit a Teledyne facility (regardless of the need to screen
      you as a non-Teledyne party), surveillance cameras may be operated to
      monitor the facility’s outside perimeter and reception area, and we will
      ask you to check in and check out, by providing the following information
      to us: full name, name of your employer, visited Teledyne staff, data of
      arrival and departure, photograph to issue a visitor badge.
We process this information in order to ensure your safety and allow us to
      locate you in case of incidents, and to ensure security of Teledyne assets
      and facilities.
11.
Trade shows or other business encounters
: When you interact with us at trade shows or on other occasions, we may
      process the following Personal Information you provided to us: your name,
      postal address, email address, telephone number, mobile number, job title.
12.
Classroom Training:
When you interact with us to register for and/or attend a classroom
      training, we will collect the following Personal Information: your name,
      email address and telephone or mobile number, your employer’s company
      address, contact name, email address and phone number (and invoicing
      address and contact name if different).
When you register for certification courses, we will collect the following
      Personal Information: your photograph, exam answer sheet, identification
      sheet signed off by yourself and instructor, student registration card;
      When you register for certification courses involving external bodies, we
      will collect the following Personal Information:
your age and date of birth, written confirmation by yourself and by your
      employer that you passed a positive vision test.
We may in addition collect the training evaluation form (if you have
      chosen to mention your email address and name on the form).
We process this information in order to:
Fulfill a contract with your employer for the provision of the purchased
        training and/or administration of the related certification procedure
        (including logistical arrangements, issuance of diplomas, and for
        certification courses: verify your identity and establishing proof of
        attendance, issuance of certification card with your photograph, exam
        results and identification data)
Pursue our legitimate interest to invite you to surveys, to improve our
        trainings and to keep your technical skills and certification up to
        date;
1.
Personal Information obtained from third-party sources
, such as providers of publicly available information or service
      providers performing services on our behalf. We may purchase lists of
      relevant customers which include Personal Information (individuals’
      contact details) collected by data brokers in accordance with applicable
      data protection laws. We use this information to invite representatives of
      your company to webinars and conferences, and to send you marketing
      communications, in accordance with the principles set forth in this
      Privacy Policy and applicable privacy laws (including for individuals
      located in the EEA, the provision of information about the processing and
      source of the Personal Information at the latest at the time of the first
      communication or within one month of obtaining the information, unless an
      exemption applies).
2.
Other
. We may also collect all of the above Personal Information for the
      following purposes as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under
      applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to
      comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and
      government authorities, including public and government authorities
      outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our terms and
      conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our
      affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or
      that of our affiliates, you or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue
      available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
Legal Basis for Our Processing of Personal Information (GDPR)
Unless expressly stated otherwise, when we collect Personal Information
      from you, the legal basis for the processing of your Personal Information
      is:
Art. 6 para 1 b) GDPR, if we process the Personal Information to
        establish and fulfil a contract with you or with your employer;
Art. 6 para 1 f) GDPR, if we process the Personal Information to enable
        our business and pursue our legitimate interests e.g., having regard to
        our existing relationship, to send you marketing communications, to
        answer your questions about products of interest to you, to transfer
        data within Teledyne affiliates for internal administration purposes, to
        ensure network security, to prevent fraud, to ensure your safety when
        you visit a Teledyne facility, in regard to product safety issues, to
        comply with applicable foreign laws (such as US Export Control and
        Sanctions Laws, anti-bribery laws), to ensure the protection of our
        legal rights, and making available the Teledyne Site to you;
Art. 6 para 1 a) GDPR, if we need to request your consent for the
        processing of Personal Information (e.g. for the use of non-essential
        cookies by Teledyne websites), and to collect Personal Information from
        third parties, if you have requested information from us through a third
        party or vendor;
Art. 6 para 1 c) GDPR, if we process the data to comply with legal
        obligations stemming from EU Member States and EU Union laws we are
        subject to.
Legal basis (other territories)
We will only Process Personal Information if and when allowed in
      accordance with applicable privacy laws. For processing of Personal
      Information which is subject to Canadian privacy laws, Teledyne will
      always request your (implied or explicit) consent (save applicable
      exceptions).
Security of Personal Information
We recognize how important your Personal Information is to you, and
      Teledyne strictly protects the security of your Personal Information and
      honors your choices for its intended use. We carefully protect the
      confidentiality and security of Personal Information and your data from
      loss, misuse, unauthorized access or disclosure, alteration, or
      destruction.
Teledyne takes precautions to protect our users’ information both online
      and offline:
Inside Teledyne, data is stored in password-controlled servers with
        limited access;
We utilize computer safeguards, such as firewalls and data encryption,
        and we enforce physical access controls to our buildings and files, to
        keep this Personal Information safe. We only authorize access to those
        Teledyne employees who need to access your Personal Information in order
        to carry out their job responsibilities;
We protect the security of your Personal Information while it is being
        transmitted, by encrypting it using Secure Sockets Layer (SSL);
We enforce physical, electronic and procedural safeguards in connection
        with the collection, storage and disclosure of Personal Information. We
        may occasionally ask for proof of identity before we share your Personal
        Information with you; and
We will reveal only the last four digits of your credit card number when
        confirming an order.
You also have a significant role in protecting your information. Except as
      described in this Privacy Policy, no one can see or edit your Personal
      Information without knowing your login and password, so do not share these
      with others.
We seek to use reasonable organizational, technical and administrative
      measures to protect Personal Information within our organization.
      Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to
      be 100% secure. So, whilst we will do our best to protect your Personal
      Information, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to
      the Teledyne Site. Any transmission is at your own risk. If you have
      reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for
      example, if you feel that the security of your account has been
      compromised), please immediately notify us in accordance with the “Contact
      Us” section below.
Personal Information Sharing
Teledyne does not rent or share your Personal Information unnecessarily,
      or without a clearly defined purpose, and not without ensuring all the
      necessary protections are in place, to ensure Teledyne meets all its legal
      obligations around the storage, transmission and processing of Personal
      Information, as set out by all relevant legislation within the markets
      that Teledyne operates. When we share your Personal Information, we do not
      allow any third-party partners to use it for their own marketing purposes.
      When we do share your Personal Information, it will only be shared with
      third-party recipients who will protect your Personal Information as
      closely as Teledyne does (including by contractually committing recipients
      to implementing appropriate technical and organizational measures in
      accordance with applicable law).
Affiliates
: We may share your Personal Information with relevant
        Affiliates of Teledyne so that they may assist you locally with the sale
        of one of our products, service, support, training, or other tasks that
        need local representation, or if sharing the data is necessary to making
        available the Teledyne Site or Teledyne Cloud Services to you. We are a
        global enterprise comprised of a group of companies operating
        internationally. Some business functions handling Personal Information
        to achieve the purposes defined in this Privacy Policy are managed
        centrally or only by some Affiliates.
Teledyne’s internal access permissions are strictly controlled, and
        Teledyne also does not allow access to your Personal Information by
        Teledyne employees unless the employee requires access to fulfil their
        role and responsibilities. All companies in the Teledyne group are
        bound, as required by law, to ensure that Personal Information is
        protected consistent with EU standards as explained in section 7
        “Transfer of personal data” below.
Service Providers
: We may also share your Personal Information
        with trusted third parties who work on behalf and upon the instructions
        of Teledyne under data processing and confidentiality agreements,
        including providers of website hosting and cloud storage, maintenance
        and call-centre services, chat cloud service, packaging, mailing and
        delivery services, training and training venue services, credit card
        processing services, providers who answer customer questions about
        products or services, send postal mail, process event registrations and
        provide other administrative services, data brokers and cookie and
        analytics providers. These third parties process the Personal
        Information on behalf of Teledyne for the purposes above (and as
        specifically agreed) and may use your Personal Information to help
        Teledyne communicate with you and for other reasons. However, these
        third parties do not have any independent right to process or share your
        Personal Information and we only share the Personal Information that
        enables our service providers to fulfil the specially agreed services.
Partners of Teledyne
which are either acting both as a processor
        and controller (for at least part of the processing operations
        involved), or as controller, such as certain payment processors and
        certain Webshop operators, as specifically agreed and in accordance with
        Teledyne's and the partner's own Privacy policy.
Sharing Personal Information with other organizations:
We may
        share Personal Information with other organizations, under the following
        circumstances:
Teledyne may disclose your Personal Information if required to do so by
        law, including laws outside your country of residence, or in the good
        faith belief that such action is necessary to: (a) conform to the edicts
        of the law or comply with legal process served on Teledyne; (b) protect
        and defend the rights, property, privacy or safety of Teledyne, our
        affiliates, you or others; or (c) allow us to pursue available remedies
        or limit the damages that we may sustain; or otherwise in response to
        law enforcement requests (including requests from authorities outside
        your country of residence);
In the event that Teledyne is acquired by or merged into another
        company, or if Teledyne undergoes any reorganization, joint venture,
        assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of its
        business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy
        or similar proceedings), all information collected will be transferred
        to the acquiring company as one of Teledyne's assets and will be
        governed by the acquiring company's privacy policy, if any.
You may submit Personal Information through the Community Forum feature of
      the Teledyne Site. Any information that you post or disclose through this
      feature may be available to other users and the general public. We urge
      you to be very careful when deciding to disclose information through the
      Community Forum feature.
For more information regarding these third parties, please contact us via
      the email address provided in the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Transferring your Personal Information
Your Personal Information may be transferred to other countries for
      processing, storage, administration or any other use stated in this
      Privacy Policy. The purposes and processing associated with any such
      transfer will comply with all applicable data protection regulations.
Where information is transferred from the European Economic Area (EEA)
      outside the EEA, and where this is to a Teledyne affiliate or vendor in a
      country that is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission,
      data is adequately protected by EU Commission approved standard
      contractual clauses, an appropriate Privacy Shield certification or a
      vendor's Processor Binding Corporate Rules. For further information on
      and/or a copy of the aforementioned safeguards, please contact us directly
      with your questions and concerns at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
Control of your Personal Information
When you register, or otherwise give us Personal Information, Teledyne
      will not share that information with third parties without your
      permission, other than as stated in this Privacy Policy.
When we offer the possibility to create your online user profile, we
      provide you with the means to ensure that your Personal Information you
      entered when you created the account is correct and current. You may
      delete, review and update the Personal Information you have provided to us
      at any time, by logging into your personal Teledyne account, which also
      allows you to change your marketing preferences. Erasure of your user
      profile will however not entail erasure of all your other Personal
      Information we may retain in all our IT systems, and for which you can
      avail yourself of the rights under “Your rights”.
Your Rights
You are entitled to ask Teledyne to obtain access to your Personal
      Information and for a copy of your information, to correct it if it is
      inaccurate and under certain conditions, to erase it or restrict its
      processing, or to ask us to transfer some of this information to other
      organizations. You may also have the right to object to some processing
      activities such as direct marketing communications or when we otherwise
      rely on our legitimate interest as a legal basis to process your Personal
      Information, and, where we have asked for your consent to process your
      data, to withdraw this consent (all requests as per this section are
      jointly referred to as “Individual Rights Requests”).
With regard to the marketing communications that we send to you by email
      you may also follow the clear unsubscribe instructions, which the email
      marketing communication will display.
These rights may be limited in some situations – for example, where we can
      demonstrate that we have a legal requirement to process your data. In some
      instances, this may mean that we are able to retain data even if you
      withdraw your consent.
There is no charge for exercising these Individual Rights Requests. If you
      wish to submit such request, then please direct it to the below address
      (see “
Contact us
”):
We may require proof of identification before fulfilling Individual Rights
      Request, so please provide clear and easy means on communicating with you
      so that, if it becomes necessary, your identification can be confirmed
      quickly and easily, and so Teledyne can meet its obligations in terms of
      the duration Teledyne has to respond to any Individual Rights Request you
      make.
Where we require Personal Information to comply with legal or contractual
      obligations, then provision of such data is mandatory: if such data is not
      provided, then we will not be able to manage our contractual relationship,
      or to meet obligations placed on us. In all other cases, provision of
      requested Personal Information is optional.
We hope that we can satisfy queries you may have about the way we process
      your data. If you have any concerns about how we process your data, or
      would like to opt out of marketing, you can get in touch with Teledyne at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
;
If you have forwarded Personal Information to one of our partners
      identifying and acting as controllers in accordance with the privacy
      policy of such partners, you should forward your request directly to them.
In the event you have unresolved concerns, you also have the right to
      complain to a data protection authority. The relevant data protection
      authority will be the data protection authority of the country that you
      reside in.
Use of Cookies
We use cookies and similar technologies on the Teledyne Site and in our
      apps for the purposes specified in section “Collection and use of your
      Personal Information and purpose” above. Cookies are small text files sent
      by a web server to your web browser and saved locally on your computer.
      The cookie allows the server to uniquely identify the browser on each
      page. Cookies do not cause any harm to your computer and do not contain
      viruses. You will find more detailed information about how we use these
      technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on
      our website, and an explanation of how, depending on your location, you
      can consent to or opt out of certain types of cookies via our Cookie
      Notice displayed on our websites.
Social Media Buttons
On the Teledyne Site we use the following social media plug-ins: Facebook,
      Twitter, LinkedIn, Instagram, YouTube. The plug-ins can be identified by
      the social media buttons marked with the logo of the provider of the
      respective social media networks.
When you surf on one of the Teledyne Site containing such plugin, your
      browser loads the plug-ins and social media buttons directly from the
      respective social media network and integrates them into the site. Through
      this process the respective social media network will receive the
      information that your browser has loaded one of our sites, even if you do
      not have a profile at the respective social network or are not currently
      logged into your profile. This information (including your IP address) is
      transmitted directly from your browser to a server, which may be located
      outside the European Economic Area and stored there.
If you are logged into your profile, the respective social network can
      immediately associate your visit to the Teledyne Site with your profile.
      The social media network will receive further information, if you interact
      with the plug-ins we have integrated into our site (e.g. click on one of
      the buttons). You can prevent such association by logging out of your
      account before visiting the Teledyne Site or by using one of the available
      blockers available as add-ons for your browser.
Information on the purpose and scope of data collection and its processing
      by social sites can be found in the respective data protection policies of
      these providers, where you will also find further information on your
      rights and options for privacy protection.
Facebook Inc., 1601 S California Ave, Palo Alto, California 94304, USA:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
Twitter, Inc., 1355 Market St, Suite 900, San Francisco, California
        94103, USA:
https://twitter.com/privacy
Instagram LLC., 1601 Willow Road, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA:
https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
LinkedIn Corporation, 2029 Stierlin Court, Mountain View, California
        94043, USA:
http://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy.
YouTube YouTube, LLC 901 Cherry Ave. San Bruno, CA 94066 USA:
https://www.youtube.com/static?template=privacy_guidelines
Google Analytics
The Teledyne Site uses Google Analytics, which is a web analytics service
      provided by the third-party provider Google, Inc. (“Google”). Google
      Analytics is used for the purpose of evaluating your use of the Teledyne
      Site, compiling reports on the Teledyne Site activity and other services
      relating to the Teledyne Site activity and internet usage. The information
      generated by the cookie about your use of the Teledyne Site is usually
      transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States. This
      transfer is covered by a separate data processing agreement (including
      applicable transfer clauses) that we have concluded with Google. For more
      information on Google Analytics and data privacy please consult Google’s
      website.
How Long we Store your Personal Information
We will only keep your Personal Information for as long as is necessary to
      fulfil the purpose it was initially collected for, unless we are obliged,
      in accordance with statutory law to retain your Personal Information for a
      specific minimum retention period. The length of time we store and utilize
      your Personal Information will therefore vary, depending on the reasons of
      your initial and recurring contact with us. Specific retention periods may
      be detailed in specific privacy notices relative to the activities
      concerned and you may request information on the applicable retention
      period from us at any time at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
or at the address provided below). After the expiration of the relevant
      retention period, we may retain your data for an appropriate period (but
      not exceeding the applicable statute of limitation under national laws) to
      protect ourselves from legal claims, or to administer our business. We
      will delete your Personal Information, when you request to erase it or
      withdraw your consent and there is no other legal ground for further
      processing (e.g. a statutory obligation to retain your Personal
      Information), or when you object to the processing in accordance with
      “Your rights” (see above) or when we are obliged to delete it in
      accordance with an obligation under applicable law.
Supplementary notice for Californian residents.
This section applies to our processing of Personal Information as a
      business under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), as amended.
For information that Teledyne collects subject to the CCPA, this Policy
      describes the categories of Personal Information that we may have
      collected or disclosed for business purposes in the past 12 months, the
      sources of the Personal Information and the business or commercial
      purposes for which we use or disclose this information (see section: “
Collection and use of your Personal Information and purposes
”), and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose the
      information for business purposes (see section “
Personal Information sharing
”).
In addition to the categories listed in section “
Collection and use of your Personal Information and purposes
”, Teledyne may collect information in the category Characteristics of
      protected classifications under California or federal law such as race,
      ancestry, national origin, religion, age, mental and physical disability,
      sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic
      information, marital status, or military status.
You have the right to access Personal Information, the right to correct
      inaccurate Personal Information, and delete Personal Information as
      further described in section “
Your rights
”.
The CCPA also gives Californian residents the right to opt-out of having
      their Personal Information sold or shared (for business purposes as
      defined by the CPRA), and to limit use and disclosure of sensitive
      personal information as understood under the CPPA (for example, your
      social security number, your precise geolocation data) for limited
      purposes such as providing you with the services you requested.
We DO NOT sell your personal information for payment or for any other
      compensation nor do we share your Personal Information for business
      purposes as defined by the CPRA. Neither do we do so for personal data of
      minors under 16 years of age.
Teledyne is only processing any sensitive information subject to CCPA for
      the permitted purposes under the CCPA for which you do not have a right to
      limit.
You have a right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for any
      exercise of your privacy rights.
If you wish to submit a CPRA request, you may initiate your request
      through teledynedsr.ethicspoint.com or by calling toll-free telephone
      number 844-235-1955. You should generally expect to receive a response
      within 45 days of the date we receive your request. However, in some
      instances, we may require an additional 45 days to process your request in
      which case we will notify you and explain why the extension is necessary.
      We will need to verify your identity before we can process your request.
      Through the request process, we will make you aware of any information
      that you will need to provide to us to process your request.
Notification of Changes to this Privacy Policy
This Notice may, from time to time, change. Such amendments might become
      necessary due to the need to keep the Notice up to date, given changes in
      Teledyne business practice or in response to legislative changes, and
      whether they are international or national changes, and may be made
      without prior notice. When we change this Privacy Policy, we will also
      revise the Privacy Policy Version Date at the top of the Privacy Policy.
      Any changes will become effective when we post the revised Privacy Policy
      on the Teledyne Sites.
Contact Us
For any questions or concerns relating to this Notice, or our data
      protection practices, or to make an Individual Rights Request, please
      contact us at:
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
, or:
Teledyne Legal Department
Teledyne Technologies Incorporated
1049 Camino Dos Rios
Thousand Oaks, CA 91360, USA
Those members of the Teledyne group established outside the EEA have
      appointed Teledyne Dalsa B.V as their EU Representative pursuant to
      Article 27 GDPR. Teledyne Dalsa B.V. can be contacted at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
Those members of the Teledyne group established outside the UK have
      appointed Teledyne UK Limited as their UK Representative pursuant to the
      UK Data Protection Act. Teledyne UK Limited can be contacted at
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
Global Data Privacy contact
Nick Wargent, General Counsel, Europe & Digital Imaging, EMEA & APAC
DataPrivacy@Teledyne.com
Teledyne UK Limited (registered in England & Wales, company number 432014)
Registered office: 106 Waterhouse Lane
Chelmsford, Essex, England, CM1 2QU​
1049 Camino Dos Rios
Thousand Oaks, CA 91360, USA
Tel: +1 (805) 373-4545
©2025 Teledyne Technologies Incorporated.
All rights reserved.
About Us
Careers
Board of Directors
Executive Profiles
Ethics & Values
Heritage
Corporate Governance
Corporate Social Responsibility
Instrumentation
Digital Imaging
Aerospace & Defense Electronics
Engineered Systems
Research Center
Terms and Conditions
Vulnerability Disclosure
Investor Presentations
Investor Information
Annual Reports
Stockholder Information
Terms of Use
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Privacy Preferences
About cookies on this site
We use cookies to personalize and enhance your experience on our site. By using our site, you consent to the use of these cookies. You can also customize your browser settings.
Privacy Preferences
Do not accept
Accept
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 1
https://twitter.com/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 2
http://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.youtube.com/static?template=privacy_guidelines:
Something went wrong
IE
Search